Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1231
Bridge commission; contracts; authorization of bonds required.

No contract for acquisition, construction, or incidents thereto, and no liabilities in connection therewith shall be entered into or incurred until bonds to finance the project have been authorized by the electors of the city in the method provided in section 14-1251, or until revenue bonds, as authorized by section 14-1217, have been issued and disposed of by the governing body of the city.

Laws 1929, c. 176, § 14, p. 625;

C.S.1929, § 14-1214;

Laws 1931, c. 27, § 3, p. 112;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 14-1214;

R.S.1943, § 14-1231.